District of Columbia statutes.
2-201.02

Rights of laborers and materialmen to sue on payment bonds; prior notice of claim required in certain cases; time limitations; suit to be brought in name of District.

(a)

Every person who has furnished labor or material in the prosecution of the work provided for in such contract, in respect of which a payment bond is furnished under this subchapter and who has not been paid in full therefor before the expiration of a period of 90 days after the day on which the last of the labor was done or performed by him or material was furnished or supplied by him for which such claim is made, shall have the right to sue on such payment bond for the amount, or the balance thereof, unpaid at the time of institution of such suit and to prosecute said action to final judgment and execution for the sum or sums justly due him: Provided, that any person having direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor but no contractual relationship, express or implied, with the contractor furnishing the payment bond, shall have a right of action upon the payment bond upon giving written notice to the contractor within 90 days from the date on which such person did or performed the last of the labor, or furnished or supplied the last of the material for which such claim is made, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the party to whom the material was furnished or supplied or for whom the labor was done or performed. Such notice shall be served by mailing the same by registered mail, postage prepaid, in an envelope addressed to the contractor at any place he maintains an office or conducts his business, or his residence, or in any manner in which the United States Marshal for the District of Columbia is authorized by law to serve summons.

(b)

Every suit instituted under this section shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia for the use of the person suing, in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, irrespective of the amount in controversy in such suit, but no such suit shall be commenced after the expiration of 1 year after the day on which the last of the labor was performed or material was supplied by him. The District of Columbia shall not be liable for the payment of any costs or expenses of any such suit.

Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 628, Pub. L. 90-455, § 2
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(3)
Definitions applicable: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-201.01.
1973 Ed., § 1-804b.
1981 Ed., § 1-1105.
This section is referenced in § 11-921.
Superior Court of the District of Columbia, jurisdiction, see § 11-921.